deriv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<Dim%>
%<Occup%>
%<With%>
%<Without%>
%<State%>
%<Like1%>
%<Like2%>

%<Tuple%>
%<Ord%>

%<acq%>
%<Bec%>
%<add%>

%<Rel%>

%<AgtR%>
%<InfA%>
%<Inf1%>
%<Inf2%>
%<AgtP%>
%<AgtF%>
%<AgtA%>
%<AgtL%>
%<Inf3%>
%<AgtI%>

%<While%>
%<After%>
%<Since%>
%<Untill%>
%<like%>
%<AsIf%>

%<AgtA%>

%<Bfr1%>
%<Bfr2%>

%<ADV%>
%<NOM%>
%<VERB%>





LEXICON NumDeriv

%<Tuple%>:%-%(%{I%}%)z Nom_CAT;
%<Ord%>:%-%(%{I%}%)nc%{I%} Nom_CAT;

LEXICON Nom_CAT

%<NOM%>: Nom;

LEXICON Nom

Nom' ; 
%<Dim%>:%-c%{I%}%{Q%} Nom'_CAT ;
%<Occup%>:%-ç%{I%} Nom'_CAT ;
%<With%>:%-l%{I%} Nom'_CAT ;
%<Without%>:%-s%{I%}z Nom'_CAT ;
%<State%>:%-l%{I%}%{Q%} Nom'_CAT ;
%<Like1%>:%-yana Nom'_CAT ;
%<Like2%>:%-sayaq Nom'_CAT ;

LEXICON CaseDeriv

%<Bec%>:%-l%{A%}ş VS1_CAT;

LEXICON Case2Deriv

%<Rel%>:%-k%{I%} Nom'_CAT;

LEXICON P5

%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON Adv_CAT

%<ADV%>: Adv;


LEXICON Adv
%<PRED%>: pred;
#;

LEXICON TAMP1Deriv

%<AgtR%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}c%{I%} Nom_CAT;
%<InfA%>:%-d%{I%}%{Q%} Nom_CAT;
%<Inf1%>:%-m%{A%} Nom_CAT;
%<Inf2%>:%-m%{A%}%{Q%} Nom_CAT;
%<AgtP%>:%-m%{I%}ş Nom_CAT;
%<AgtF%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{Q%} Nom_CAT;
%<InfF%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{Q%} Nom_CAT;
%<AgtA%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}n Nom_CAT;
%<AgtL%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}s%{I%} Nom_CAT;
%<Inf3%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}ş Nom_CAT;
%<AgtI%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}r Nom_CAT;
%<While%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}r%{A%}%{Q%} Adv_CAT;
%<After%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}nc%{A%} Adv_CAT;
%<Since%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}l%{I%} Adv_CAT;
%<Untill%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}nc%{A%}y%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON TAMP3Deriv

%<AgtA%>:%-%(%{A%}%)r Nom_CAT;
%<Bfr1%>:%-m%{A%}d%{A%}n Adv_CAT;
%<Bfr2%>:%-m%{I%}şd%{A%}n Adv_CAT;


LEXICON TAMP2Deriv

%<AgtA%>:%-z Nom_CAT;
